California statutes. Water Code
 the estimated cost of lands, easements and rights-of-way for the project, no money shall be reallocated by the State in aid of that portion of the project until the revised plan has been reviewed and approved by the department. Such approval shall be given if the department finds in its judgment that the benefits of the proposed works of improvement for the revised project will exceed the cost thereof and that the revised project appears to be the most economical project plan, considering construction costs, lands, easements and rights-of-way costs, and costs of operation and maintenance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2092.)
-------------------------------------------

12639.1.

The department may investigate any project adopted and authorized by the state and approved by the Congress to determine whether the project is no longer justified and whether appropriate action should be taken to deauthorize the project. The department shall coordinate that investigation with the federal agency involved in the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 230, Sec. 32.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

12640.

The provisions of Part 2 of this division shall be applicable to all water made available by the construction of the works of any project approved by Chapters 1 and 2 of this part. No priority under Part 2 shall be released nor assignment made of any appropriation that will, in the judgment of the Department of Water Resources, deprive the county in which the appropriated water originates of any water necessary for the development of the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1269.)
-------------------------------------------

12641.

Any county, city, state agency or public district is authorized to make agreements with the United States or any of its departments or agencies obligating them to do or perform those things which are required of them by Chapters 1 and 2 of this part and by the act of Congress approved December 22, 1944 (Public, Numbered 534, Seventy-eighth Congress, Second Session), and the act of Congress approved August 18, 1941 (Public, Numbered 228, Seventy-eighth Congress, First Session).

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12642.

In all cases where the Federal Government does not maintain and operate projects, it is the responsibility and duty of the county, city, state agency, or public district affected to maintain and operate flood control and other works, constructed pursuant to Chapters 1 and 2 of this part, after their completion and hold and save the State and the United States free from damages.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12643.

Prior to any local agency receiving payment or reimbursement pursuant to Section 12585.5 or 12585.7, for projects authorized on or after January 1, 2001, the agency shall enter into an agreement with the department or Reclamation Board pursuant to which the agency agrees to indemnify and hold and save the state, and its officers, agents, and employees, harmless from any and all liability for damages, as provided in Sections 12642 and 12828.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1071, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Projects in the Sacramento-San Joaquin Watersheds [12645. - 12670.23.]

12645.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) In 1911, the Legislature adopted a flood control plan for the Sacramento Valley, as proposed by the federal California Debris Commission, and created the Reclamation Board to regulate levees and other encroachments, and to review and approve flood control plans for the Sacramento River and its tributaries. The state’s adoption of a valleywide flood management plan was intended to create a unified plan of flood control and to reclaim lands from overflow. Six years later, California gained congressional authorization for the United States Army Corps of Engineers (Corps) to collaborate with the state in building and maintaining the Sacramento River Flood Control Project. The federal
 government transferred completed portions of the Sacramento River Flood Control Project to the state as portions were completed, and the state, in turn, passed responsibility for operation and maintenance to local districts organized to provide flood control within their boundaries.

(b) The state and federal governments have built or rebuilt levees, weirs, and bypasses to increase conveyance of flood waters downstream. The Sacramento River Flood Control Project and the federal-state flood control project in the San Joaquin Valley include approximately 1,600 miles of levees and other facilities to reduce central valley flood risk, now defined as the State Plan of Flood Control in subdivision (j) of Section 5096.805 of the Public Resources Code. The Corps often constructed federal “project levees” in both the Sacramento and San Joaquin River watersheds by modifying existing levees. The federal government transferred completed portions of the
 Sacramento River Flood Control Project to the state, as portions were completed, which in turn passed responsibility for operation and maintenance to local reclamation districts.

(c) In 2003, a state Court of Appeal in Paterno v. State of California (2003) 113 Cal.App.4th 998 (Paterno), held the state liable, in a claim for inverse condemnation, for failure of a levee that was operated and maintained by a local levee maintenance district. In settlement of that litigation, the state’s liability was substantial because homes and a shopping center were built behind the levee and suffered from the resulting flood.

(d) The Legislature has authorized funding for numerous flood control projects throughout the Sacramento and San Joaquin River watersheds. These statutory authorizations included varying provisions regarding responsibility and liability for operation and maintenance of the
 flood control facilities, and may or may not have incorporated the specified facilities into the federal-state Sacramento River or San Joaquin River flood control projects. After the court ruling in Paterno, the status of each flood facility became critically important to determining liability, and legal ambiguities led to questions about whether particular facilities were incorporated into a federal-state flood control project. In some cases, despite a location between two project levees, certain levees remain outside the jurisdiction of a federal-state flood control project, with local agencies retaining liability.

(e) In 2006, California voters approved the Disaster Preparedness and Flood Prevention Bond Act of 2006, which authorized the issuance of general obligation bonds in the amount of $4.9 billion for flood protection and defined the Sacramento River and San Joaquin River federal-state flood control projects as the “State Plan of Flood
 Control.” The following year, the Legislature passed a package of bills to reform state flood protection policy in the central valley. These laws required the Department of Water Resources to develop, and the Central Valley Flood Protection Board to adopt, a Central Valley Flood Protection Plan, which is broader than the State Plan of Flood Control, affecting the entire watersheds of the Sacramento and San Joaquin Valley. These laws included provisions intended to limit state liability to facilities identified in the State Plan of Flood Control. These laws did not specifically address the facilities described in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 238.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

12646.

Unless the context requires otherwise, the definitions set forth in this section govern the construction of this chapter.

(a) “Board” means the Central Valley Flood Protection Board.

(b) “Plan” means the Central Valley Flood Protection Plan.

(c) “Project levee” means any levee that is part of the
 facilities of the State Plan of Flood Control.

(d) “Public safety infrastructure” means public safety infrastructure necessary to respond to a flood emergency, including, but not limited to, street and highway evacuation routes, medical care facilities, and public utilities necessary for public health and safety, including drinking water and wastewater treatment facilities.

(e) “Sacramento-San Joaquin Valley” means any lands in the bed or along or near the banks of the Sacramento River or San Joaquin River, or any of their tributaries or connected therewith, or upon any land adjacent thereto, or within any of the overflow basins thereof, or upon any land susceptible to overflow therefrom. The Sacramento-San Joaquin Valley does not include lands lying within the Tulare Lake basin, including the Kings River.

(f) “State
 Plan of Flood Control” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (j) of Section 5096.805 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 275, Sec. 22.   (AB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

12647.

(a) The state shall not have responsibility or liability for the construction, operation, and maintenance of central valley flood control facilities identified in this article unless all of the following apply:

(1) The department identifies the facility as part of the State Plan of Flood Control.

(2) The state has expressly accepted the transfer of liability for the facility from the federal government.

(3) The board incorporates the facility into the State Plan of Flood Control pursuant to Section 9611.

(b) Unless otherwise
 specifically provided, nothing in this article shall be construed to expand the responsibility of the state for the operation or maintenance of any flood management facility outside the scope of the State Plan of Flood Control, except as specifically determined by the board pursuant to Section 9611.

(c) Use of the phrase “adopted and authorized” in this article does not, by itself, reflect incorporation of the specified facility into the State Plan of Flood Control or assumption of liability by the state, unless one of the conditions described in subdivision (a) applies to the facility.

(d) Nothing in this section abrogates or modifies any duty, responsibility, or liability of any federal, state, or local agency, including, but not limited to, those duties, responsibilities, and liabilities set forth in Sections 8370, 12642, and 12828.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 239.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

12648.

The projects for the control of floods and other purposes on the Sacramento River adopted by the acts of Congress approved March 1, 1917, May 15, 1928, August 26, 1937, and August 18, 1941, and adopted and authorized by the Legislature by Chapter 25, Statutes of 1911, First Extra Session, Chapter 170, Statutes of 1913, Chapter 686, Statutes of 1915, and Chapter 176, Statutes of 1925, are adopted and authorized as modified substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 649, Seventy-eighth Congress, Second Session, except as provided in Section 12649, at an estimated additional cost to the State of three million three
 hundred twenty-six thousand dollars ($3,326,000), or such other project as shall finally be decided upon which will accomplish the same flood control purposes as proposed by the Table Mountain Dam or any other dam across the Sacramento River in the same general vicinity, subject to modification that may hereafter be made by Congress.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12648.1.

The plan of flood control on the American River is hereby authorized and adopted substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers, House Document Numbered 367, Eighty-first Congress, and adopted and authorized by the act of Congress approved August 17, 1954, at an estimated state cost of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000). Said project shall be considered as extending and supplementing the projects authorized pursuant to Section 12648. Section 12828 shall not be applicable to the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 321.)
-------------------------------------------

12648.2.

The project for flood protection on the Sacramento River from Chico Landing to Red Bluff, California, is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 272, Eighty-fourth Congress, Second Session, and adopted and authorized by the act of Congress approved July 3, 1958, at an estimated state cost of thirty-one thousand dollars ($31,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1912.)
-------------------------------------------

12648.3.

The project for Hidden Reservoir and channel improvement on the Fresno River is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in Senate Document Numbered 37, 87th Congress, and adopted and authorized by the Act of Congress approved October 23, 1962, (Public Law 87-874) at an estimated state cost of two hundred twenty thousand dollars ($220,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1202.)
-------------------------------------------

12648.4.

The project for Buchanan Reservoir and channel improvement on Chowchilla River is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in Senate Document Numbered 98, 87th Congress, and adopted and authorized by the Act of Congress approved October 23, 1962, (Public Law 87-874) at an estimated state cost of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1203.)
-------------------------------------------

12648.5.

The project for New Melones Reservoir and channel improvement on Stanislaus River is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 453, 87th Congress, and adopted and authorized by the Act of Congress approved October 23, 1962, (Public Law 87-874) at an estimated state cost of one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 918.)
-------------------------------------------

12648.6.

The Mormon Slough channel improvement project on Calaveras River is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendation of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 576, 87th Congress, and adopted and authorized by the act of Congress approved October 23, 1962 (Public Law 87-874) at an estimated state cost of two million two hundred sixty thousand dollars ($2,260,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 915.)
-------------------------------------------

12648.7.

The project for flood protection on the North Fork of the Feather River near Chester, Plumas County, is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document No. 314, 90th Congress, and adopted and authorized by the Act of Congress approved August 13, 1968 (Public Law 90-483) at an estimated cost to the state of such sums as may be appropriated for state participation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the Reclamation Board. This authorization shall not be deemed to confer preference on this project over the needs of other statewide programs in appropriations of available
 funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1443.)
-------------------------------------------

12649.

It is the intention of the Legislature that, if a feasible plan can be found which will provide adequate flood control in the upper Sacramento Valley without the necessity of constructing a dam across the Sacramento River at the Table Mountain site, or any other site in the same general vicinity and thereby prevent the necessity of flooding valuable agricultural land and at the same time prevent damage to the fishing resources of the Sacramento River, such alternate plan should be adopted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12649.1.

The project for flood protection on the Sacramento River is further adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in Senate Document Numbered 103, 86th Congress, and as modified by the act of Congress, Public Law 86-645, 86th Congress, approved July 14, 1960, for cooperation by the Reclamation Board as provided in Section 8617.1 at an estimated cost to the state of such sums as may be appropriated for state participation by the Legislature upon recommendation and advice of the Reclamation Board. This authorization shall not be deemed to confer preference on this project over the needs of other statewide programs in
 appropriations of available funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1596.)
-------------------------------------------

12650.

The plan of improvement for flood protection on various streams in the Merced County Stream Group in the San Joaquin Valley is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 473, Seventy-eighth Congress, Second Session, at an estimated cost to the State of sixty-one thousand three hundred dollars ($61,300).

Notwithstanding any estimated cost to the State contained in this section, local cooperation which shall be furnished by the State in connection with the plan of improvement for flood protection on various streams in the Merced County Stream Group in
 the San Joaquin Valley, adopted and authorized under this section shall include, without limitation as to the generality thereof:

(a) Enlargement of the channel of Miles Creek to the extent indicated on Inclosure 3 of House Document Numbered 473, Seventy-eighth Congress, Second Session.

(b) Acquisition of lands, easements and rights of way necessary for construction of the following diversions to the capacities indicated:

(1) Owens Creek Diversion, 400 cubic feet per second.

(2) Black Rascal Diversion, 3,000 cubic feet per second.

(c) Providing the following channel capacities of the various creeks:

(1) Burns Creek: 2,000
 cubic feet per second on Burns Creek from its confluence with Bear Creek upstream to the section line common to Sections 3 and 10, T. 7 S., R. 15 E., M. D. B. & M.

(2) Bear Creek: 2,000 cubic feet per second from its confluence with Burns Creek upstream to the section line common to Sections 11 and 12, T. 7 S., R. 15 E., M. D. B. & M.; 4,000 cubic feet per second from its confluence with Black Rascal Creek Diversion upstream to its confluence with Burns Creek; 7,000 cubic feet per second from its confluence with the head of Black Rascal Slough to the Black Rascal Creek Diversion; not less than 3,100 cubic feet per second from its confluence with the lower end of Black Rascal Slough to the confluence with the head of Black Rascal Slough, so that the combined capacity of Bear Creek and Black Rascal Slough is not less than 7,000 cubic feet per second; 7,000 cubic feet per second from the section line common to Sections 2 and 3, T. 8 S., R.
 12 E., M. D. B. & M., upstream to the confluence of Bear Creek with the lower end of Black Rascal Slough.

(3) Black Rascal Slough: Not less than 3,900 cubic feet per second and so that the combined capacity of Black Rascal Slough and Bear Creek is not less than 7,000 cubic feet per second.

(4) Miles Creek: 1,000 cubic feet per second from the Merced-El Nido Highway upstream to the section line common to Sections 25 and 26, T. 7 S., R. 15 E., M. D. B. & M.

(5) Owens Creek: 400 cubic feet per second from Owens Creek Diversion to the bridge crossing at the section line common to Sections 29 and 30, T. 7 S., R. 16 E., M. D. B. & M.

(6) Mariposa Creek: 1,000 cubic feet per second from Owens Creek Diversion upstream to the bridge located in SW.
 14 of Section 10, T. 8 S., R. 16 E., M. D. B. & M.; 1,250 cubic feet per second from El Nido Highway upstream to Owens Creek Diversion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1118.)
-------------------------------------------

12651.

The plan of improvement for flood control and other purposes on the Lower San Joaquin River and tributaries, including Tuolumne and Stanislaus Rivers, is adopted and authorized in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in Flood Control Committee Document Numbered 2, Seventy-eighth Congress, Second Session, at an estimated cost to the State of eight hundred ninety-four thousand dollars ($894,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12652.

The plan of improvement for flood control and other purposes on the Calaveras River and Littlejohn Creek and tributaries is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 545, Seventy-eighth Congress, Second Session, at an estimated cost to the State of two hundred four thousand dollars ($204,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12653.

The plan of improvement on the Calaveras River and Littlejohn Creek includes the enlargement of channels of Littlejohn Creek below the Farmington Dam as subsequently approved by letter of the Chief of Engineers dated November 12, 1951, at an additional estimated cost to the State of such sum as may be available for state cooperation for that purpose in the Flood Control Emergency Fund, pursuant to written authorization of the Department of Finance for Flood Control projects, payable from the Flood Control Fund of 1946, upon approval of the general plan for such channel enlargements by, and the recommendation of, the department, or as may be otherwise appropriated for state
 cooperation by the Legislature, payable from the Flood Control Fund of 1946, upon approval of the general plan for such channel enlargements by, and with the recommendation of, the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

12654.

The project for the Fresno County Stream Group for flood control is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Numbered 845, Seventy-sixth Congress, Third Session, at an estimated cost to the State of one hundred seventy-nine thousand five hundred dollars ($179,500).

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12655.

The City and County of San Francisco, the Modesto Irrigation District, and the Turlock Irrigation District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of War that the local cooperation required by Section 3 of the act of Congress approved December 22, 1944 (Public, Numbered 534, Seventy-eighth Congress, Second Session), will be furnished by the City and County of San Francisco, the Modesto Irrigation District, and the Turlock Irrigation District in connection with the flood control projects within the watershed of the Tuolumne River, adopted and authorized in Section 12651, except insofar as the projects include channel improvement works and levees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12656.

The City and County of San Francisco, the Modesto Irrigation District, and the Turlock Irrigation District, in conjunction with the War Department, shall execute the plans and projects within the watershed of the Tuolumne River, referred to in Section 12651, except insofar as the plans and projects relate to channel improvement works and levees, and may make such modifications to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 and 2 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12656.5.

The project for flood protection on Middle Creek, California, is hereby authorized and adopted substantially in accordance with the recommendation of the Chief of Engineers in House Document numbered 367, Eighty-first Congress, and adopted and authorized by the act of Congress approved August 17, 1954, at an estimated state cost of seven hundred ninety thousand dollars ($790,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1959.)
-------------------------------------------

12656.6.

The Reclamation Board is authorized to provide any assurances to the Secretary of the Army which may be required in connection with the accomplishment of emergency repair work under Public Law 99, 84th Congress, 1st Session, approved June 28, 1955, or any acts amending or adding to the same, now or hereafter adopted, for projects which the Reclamation Board is authorized to provide assurances under Section 12657. The Reclamation Board is also authorized to utilize any available appropriation it may have for the purpose of acquiring any lands, easements and rights of way necessary to the execution of any such repair work for which assurances have been required by the
 Secretary of the Army.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------

12656.7.

The Reclamation Board is authorized to provide any assurances to the Secretary of the Army which may be required in connection with the accomplishment of flood control or clearing work on the channel of the Sacramento and San Joaquin Rivers and their tributaries, pursuant to Section 208 of Public Law 780, 83rd Congress, 2nd Session, approved September 3, 1954, or any acts amending or adding to the same now or hereafter adopted, or with the accomplishment of any federal emergency flood control work on state-owned property. This authorization is subject to the provisions of Section 12828.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1284.)
-------------------------------------------

12657.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and this chapter, the Reclamation Board shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation, required by Section 3 of the act of Congress approved December 22, 1944 (P.L. 534, 78th Congress, Second Session), Section 2 of the act of Congress approved August 18, 1941 (P.L. 228, 78th Congress, First Session), and Section 103 of the act of Congress approved November 17, 1986 (P.L. 99-662, 99th Congress, Second Session) will be
 furnished by the state in connection with the flood control projects authorized and adopted in Sections 12648, 12648.1, 12648.2, 12648.3, 12648.4, 12648.5, 12648.6, 12648.7, 12649.1, 12650, 12651, 12652, 12654, 12656.5, 12661.2, 12661.5, 12666, 12667, 12670.2, 12670.7, 12670.10, 12670.14, and 12670.20 and on any flood control projects on any stream flowing into or in the Sacramento Valley or the San Joaquin Valley heretofore or hereafter approved and authorized by Congress.

(b) Assurances provided pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be made until the local agency, by binding agreement with the Reclamation Board, has agreed to assume all obligations under Sections 12585 to 12585.5, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1071, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12658.

Except as otherwise provided in Chapters 1 and 2 of this part, the Reclamation Board, in conjunction with the War Department, shall execute the plans and projects referred to in Section 12657 and exercise all powers granted to it in Part 4, Division 5, of this code. The Reclamation Board may make such modifications and amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes stated in Chapters 1 and 2 of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12659.

The project for the Folsom Reservoir on the American River is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the plans contained in House Document Numbered 649, Seventy-eighth Congress, Second Session, with such modifications as in the discretion of the Secretary of War and the Chief of Engineers may be advisable, and without cost to the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12660.

The project for the Isabella Reservoir on the Kern River for flood control and other purposes in the San Joaquin Valley is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in his report dated January 26, 1944, contained in House Document Numbered 513, Seventy-eighth Congress, Second Session, without cost to the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12661.

The plan for the Terminus and Success Reservoirs on the Kaweah and Tule Rivers for flood control and other purposes in the San Joaquin Valley is adopted and authorized in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in Flood Control Committee Document Numbered 1, Seventy-eighth Congress, Second Session.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

12661.2.

(a) The project for flood control on the Tule River, Success Reservoir Enlargement Project, is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers of the United States Army Corps of Engineers, in the report “Tule River Basin Investigation, California, Feasibility Report,” dated April 1999, at an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated by the Legislature for state cooperation, upon the recommendation and advice of the Reclamation Board.

(b) The agencies that are parties to the Tule River Improvement Joint Powers Agreement may, in lieu of the Reclamation Board, give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the nonfederal cooperation required by federal law will be furnished in connection with the project for flood control adopted and authorized in subdivision (a).

(c) The agencies that are parties to the Tule River Improvement Joint Powers Agreement, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, may, in lieu of the Reclamation Board, carry out the design and construction of the Success Reservoir Enlargement Project and may make modifications and amendments as necessary to carry out the project for the purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1071, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

12661.5.

(a) The project for flood control on the Kaweah River, Terminus Dam, is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers, in the report “Kaweah River Basin Investigation Feasibility Study, California,” dated December 23, 1996, and as adopted and authorized by the Water Resources Development Act of 1996 as approved by Congress on October 12, 1996 (Public Law 104-303), at an estimated cost to the state of the sum that may be appropriated by the Legislature for state participation, upon the
 recommendation and advice of the Reclamation Board. The Reclamation Board may pay 50 percent of the nonfederal capital costs of the recreation and fish and wildlife enhancement features of the project.

(b) The Kaweah Delta Water Conservation District may, in lieu of the Reclamation Board, give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation required by federal law, including the Water Resources Development Act of 1996, will be furnished in connection with the project.

(c) The Kaweah Delta Water Conservation District, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, may, in lieu of the Reclamation Board, carry out the plans and project and may make modifications and amendments of the plans as necessary to carry out the plans for the purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and this chapter.

(d) Authorization of the project shall be contingent upon the recommendation, advice, and approval of the Reclamation Board and upon the expenditure of two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) by the department for local assistance for the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 189, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

12662.

The project for flood control and other purposes for the Kings River and Tulare Lake Basin is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document Number 630, Seventy-sixth Congress, Third Session, as adopted and authorized by the act of Congress approved December 22, 1944 (Public Law 78-534, the “Flood Control Act of 1944”), as modified by data in the Design Memorandum No. 3, Kings River and Tulare Lake, California, Kings River Channel Improvement, General Design, dated April 20, 1959, and by Letter Supplement No. 1 to such Design Memorandum No. 3, by the District Engineer, Sacramento District, Corps of
 Engineers, at no cost to the state prior to July 1, 1967, and thereafter at an estimated cost to the state of such sums as may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department. This authorization shall not be deemed to confer preference on this project over the needs of other statewide programs in appropriations of available funds.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the state shall share only in costs for work done in accordance with Letter Supplement No. 1 to such Design Memorandum No. 3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 704.)
-------------------------------------------

12662.1.

The Kings River Conservation District shall give assurances satisfactory to the Secretary of the Army that the local cooperation, required by the act of Congress approved December 22, 1944 (Public Law 78-534, the “Flood Control Act of 1944”), as modified by Design Memorandum No. 3, Kings River and Tulare Lake, California, Kings River Channel Improvement, General Design, dated April 20, 1959, and by Letter Supplement No. 1 to such Design Memorandum No. 3, will be furnished by the district in connection with the plan of improvement for flood control adopted and authorized in Section 12662.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 704.)
-------------------------------------------

12662.2.

The Kings River Conservation District, in conjunction with the Department of the Army, shall execute the plan of improvement for flood control referred to in Section 12662 and exercise all powers granted to it in the Kings River Conservation District Act (Chapter 931, Statutes of 1951), and the district may make such modifications or amendments to the plans as may be necessary to execute them for the purposes of Chapters 1 (commencing with Section 12570) and 2 (commencing with Section 12639) of this part. The department shall have authority and is hereby authorized to enter into an agreement with the local agency pursuant to Section 12585.4. Notwithstanding the provisions
 of Sections 12585.2 and 12585.3 the local agency may receive credit against its share of the costs of lands, easements, and rights-of-way required for the project which were acquired by the local agency after July 1, 1967.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 704.)
-------------------------------------------

12663.

The plan of improvement for flood control and water conservation on Cache Creek, including Clear Lake, in Yolo and Lake Counties, is hereby adopted and authorized generally in accordance with the recommendations relating thereto contained in the interim report of the Department of Water Resources entitled “Comparison of Alternative Wilson Valley and Guinda Projects on Cache Creek,” dated April, 1958, at an estimated cost to the State of such sum as may be appropriated for state co-operation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2056.)
-------------------------------------------

12664.

The project for the Beach-Stone Lake Unit of the Morrison Creek Stream Group Flood Control Project is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the plans developed by the County of Sacramento at such estimated cost to the state as may be appropriated for state cooperation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the department. This authorization shall not be deemed to confer preference on this project over the needs of other statewide programs in appropriation of available funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1569.)
-------------------------------------------

12665.

With respect to the project authorized in Section 12664, the County of Sacramento shall acquire the lands, easements, and rights-of-way, even though the project report has not been submitted by the Secretary of the Army or other authorized official to the Congress for project authorization, and may make application to the department for reimbursement pursuant to Section 12829 upon inclusion of the Beach-Stone Lake Unit of the Morrison Creek Stream Group Flood Control Project as part of a flood control project authorized by Congress. Prior to the acquisition of any lands, easements, or rights-of-way for the project, the County of Sacramento shall execute an agreement with the
 department under which it agrees to hold the state harmless from damages due to the construction, operation, or maintenance of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1569.)
-------------------------------------------

12666.

The project for flood protection on the streams in the vicinity of Fairfield, California, is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in House Document No. 91-159, 91st Congress, First Session, and adopted and authorized by the act of Congress approved December 31, 1970 (Public Law 91-611) at an estimated cost to the state of such sums as may be appropriated for state participation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the Reclamation Board. This authorization shall not be deemed to confer preference on this project over the needs of other statewide programs in appropriations of available funds.
 No state funds shall be appropriated until federal advanced engineering and design funds are available.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 12585.4, the Reclamation Board shall have the authority and is hereby authorized to enter into a loan agreement with the local agency pursuant to Section 12585.4. The state is authorized to pay 50 percent of the nonfederal capital costs of the recreation and fish and wildlife enhancement features of the project pursuant to Section 12847.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 183.)
-------------------------------------------

12667.

The project for flood control known as the Merced County Streams Project is adopted and authorized substantially in accordance with the recommendations of the Chief of Engineers in his report dated November 25, 1970, and adopted and authorized by the Act of Congress approved December 31, 1970 (Public Law 91-611) at an estimated cost to the state of such sums as may be appropriated for state participation by the Legislature upon the recommendation and advice of the Reclamation Board. This authorization shall not be deemed to confer preference on this project over the needs of other statewide programs in appropriations of